Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare public option. new text end new text begin "MinnesotaCare public option" or "public option" has the meaning provided in section 256L.01, subdivision 5a. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare public option enrollee. new text end new text begin "MinnesotaCare public option enrollee" or "public option enrollee" has the meaning provided in section 256L.01, subdivision 5b. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Creation. MNsure is created as a board under section 15.012, paragraph (a), to: (1) promote informed consumer choice, innovation, competition, quality, value, market participation, affordability, suitable and meaningful choices, health improvement, care management, reduction of health disparities, and portability of health plansnew text begin and the public optionnew text end ; (2) facilitate and simplify the comparison, choice, enrollment, and purchase of health plans for individuals purchasing in the individual market through MNsure deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end for employees and employers purchasing in the small group market through MNsurenew text begin , and for individuals purchasing the public optionnew text end ; (3) assist small employers with access to small business health insurance tax credits and to assist individuals with access to public health care programs, premium assistance tax credits and cost-sharing reductions, and certificates of exemption from individual responsibility requirements; (4) facilitate the integration and transition of individuals between public health care programsnew text begin , including the public option,new text end and health plans in the individual or group market and develop processes that, to the maximum extent possible, provide for continuous coverage; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) establish and modify as necessary a name and brand for MNsure based on market studies that show maximum effectiveness in attracting the uninsured and motivating them to take actiondeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) ensure simple, convenient, and understandable access to enrollment in the public option through the MNsure website. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.03, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Continued operation of a private marketplace. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit: (1) a health carrier from offering outside of MNsure a health plan to a qualified individual or qualified employer; and (2) a qualified individual from enrolling in, or a qualified employer from selecting for its employees, a health plan offered outside of MNsure. (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the choice of a qualified individual to enroll or not enroll in a qualified health plannew text begin or the public optionnew text end or to participate in MNsure. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to compel an individual to enroll in a qualified health plannew text begin or the public optionnew text end or to participate in MNsure. (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "qualified individual" and "qualified employer" have the meanings given in section 1312 of the Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, and further defined through amendments to the act and regulations issued under the act. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Insurance producers. (a) By April 30, 2013, the board, in consultation with the commissioner of commerce, shall establish certification requirements that must be met by insurance producers in order to assist individuals and small employers with purchasing coverage through MNsure. deleted text begin Prior to January 1, 2015, the board may amend the requirements, only if necessary, due to a change in federal rules.deleted text end (b) Certification requirementsnew text begin under paragraph (a)new text end shall not exceed the requirements established under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, deleted text begin partdeleted text end new text begin sectionnew text end 155.220. Certification shall include training on health plans available through MNsure, available tax credits and cost-sharing arrangements, compliance with privacy and security standards, eligibility verification processes, online enrollment tools, and basic information on available public health care programs. Training required for certification under this subdivision shall qualify for continuing education requirements for insurance producers required under chapter 60K, and must comply with course approval requirements under chapter 45. (c) new text begin For enrollment in qualified health plans, new text end producer compensation shall be established by health carriers that provide health plans through MNsure. The structure of compensation to insurance producers must be similar for health plans sold through MNsure and outside MNsure. (d) Any insurance producer compensation structure established by a health carrier for the small group market must include compensation for defined contribution plans that involve multiple health carriers. The compensation offered must be commensurate with other small group market defined health plans. (e) Any insurance producer assisting an individual or small employer with purchasing coverage through MNsure must disclose, orally and in writing, to the individual or small employer at the time of the first solicitation with the prospective purchaser the following: (1) the health carriers and qualified health plans offered through MNsure that the producer is authorized to sell, and that the producer may not be authorized to sell all the qualified health plans offered through MNsure; (2) that the producer may be receiving compensation from a health carrier for enrolling the individual or small employer into a particular health plan; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) that information on all qualified health plans offered through MNsurenew text begin and the public optionnew text end is available through the MNsure websitedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) that the producer may receive compensation from the state for enrolling an individual in the public option. new text end For purposes of this paragraph, "solicitation" means any contact by a producer, or any person acting on behalf of a producer made for the purpose of selling or attempting to sell coverage through MNsure. If the first solicitation is made by telephone, the disclosures required under this paragraph need not be made in writing, but the fact that disclosure has been made must be acknowledged on the application. (f) Beginning January 15, 2015, each health carrier that offers or sells qualified health plans through MNsure shall report in writing to the board and the commissioner of commerce the compensation and other incentives it offers or provides to insurance producers with regard to each type of health plan the health carrier offers or sells both inside and outside of MNsure. Each health carrier shall submit a report annually and upon any change to the compensation or other incentives offered or provided to insurance producers. (g) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an insurance producer from offering professional advice and recommendations to a small group purchaser based upon information provided to the producer. (h) An insurance producer that offers health plans in the small group market shall notify each small group purchaser of which group health plans qualify for Internal Revenue Service approved section 125 tax benefits. The insurance producer shall also notify small group purchasers of state law provisions that benefit small group plans when the employer agrees to pay 50 percent or more of its employees' premium. Individuals who are eligible for cost-effective medical assistance will count toward the 75 percent participation requirement in section 62L.03, subdivision 3. (i) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the licensure requirements or regulatory functions of the commissioner of commerce under chapter 60K. new text begin (j) The board may establish certification requirements that must be met by insurance producers in order to assist individuals with enrolling in the public option. new text end new text begin (k) Health carriers must pay an insurance producer a $....... application assistance bonus for each applicant the insurance producer successfully enrolls in the public option. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.05, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Navigator; in-person assisters; call center. (a) The board shall establish policies and procedures for the ongoing operation of a navigator program, in-person assister program, call center, and customer service provisions for MNsure to be implemented beginning January 1, 2015. (b) Until the implementation of the policies and procedures described in paragraph (a), the following shall be in effect: (1) the navigator program shall be met by section 256.962; (2) entities eligible to be navigators, including entities defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, part 155.210 (c)(2), may serve as in-person assisters; (3) the board shall establish requirements and compensation for the navigator program and the in-person assister program by April 30, 2013. Compensation for navigators and in-person assisters must take into account any other compensation received by the navigator or in-person assister for conducting the same or similar services; and (4) call center operations shall utilize existing state resources and personnel, including referrals to counties for medical assistance. (c) The board shall establish a toll-free number for MNsure and may hire and contract for additional resources as deemed necessary. (d) The navigator program and in-person assister program must meet the requirements of section 1311(i) of the Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148. In establishing training standards for the navigators and in-person assisters, the board must ensure that all entities and individuals carrying out navigator and in-person assister functions have training in the needs of underserved and vulnerable populations; eligibility and enrollment rules and procedures; the range of available public health care programsnew text begin , including the public option,new text end and qualified health plan options offered through MNsure; and privacy and security standards. For calendar year 2014, the commissioner of human services shall ensure that the navigator program under section 256.962 provides application assistance for both qualified health plans offered through MNsure and public health care programs. (e) The board must ensure that any information provided by navigators, in-person assisters, the call center, or other customer assistance portals be accessible to persons with disabilities and that information provided on public health care programs include information on other coverage options available to persons with disabilities. new text begin (f) The board may pay a navigator and in-person assister for each successful enrollment through MNsure into a public health care program, a qualified health plan, or the public option. The board must set the payment rate. Payments are based on the availability of funding. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.05, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Appeals. (a) The board may conduct hearings, appoint hearing officers, and recommend final orders related to appeals of any MNsure determinations, except for those determinations identified in paragraph (d). An appeal by a health carrier regarding a specific certification or selection determination made by MNsure under subdivision 5 must be conducted as a contested case proceeding under chapter 14, with the report or order of the administrative law judge constituting the final decision in the case, subject to judicial review under sections 14.63 to 14.69. For other appeals, the board shall establish hearing processes which provide for a reasonable opportunity to be heard and timely resolution of the appeal and which are consistent with the requirements of federal law and guidance. An appealing party may be represented by legal counsel at these hearings, but this is not a requirement. (b) MNsure may establish service-level agreements with state agencies to conduct hearings for appeals. Notwithstanding section 471.59, subdivision 1, a state agency is authorized to enter into service-level agreements for this purpose with MNsure. (c) For proceedings under this subdivision, MNsure may be represented by an attorney who is an employee of MNsure. (d) This subdivision does not apply to appeals of determinations where a state agency hearing is available under section 256.045. (e) An appellant aggrieved by an order of MNsure issued in an eligibility appeal, as defined in Minnesota Rules, part 7700.0101, may appeal the order to the district court of the appellant's county of residence by serving a written copy of a notice of appeal upon MNsure and any other adverse party of record within 30 days after the date MNsure issued the order, the amended order, or order affirming the original order, and by filing the original notice and proof of service with the court administrator of the district court. Service may be made personally or by mail; service by mail is complete upon mailing; no filing fee shall be required by the court administrator in appeals taken pursuant to this subdivision. MNsure shall furnish all parties to the proceedings with a copy of the decision and a transcript of any testimony, evidence, or other supporting papers from the hearing held before the appeals examiner within 45 days after service of the notice of appeal. (f) Any party aggrieved by the failure of an adverse party to obey an order issued by MNsure may compel performance according to the order in the manner prescribed in sections 586.01 to 586.12. (g) Any party may obtain a hearing at a special term of the district court by serving a written notice of the time and place of the hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing. The court may consider the matter in or out of chambers, and shall take no new or additional evidence unless it determines that such evidence is necessary for a more equitable disposition of the appeal. (h) Any party aggrieved by the order of the district court may appeal the order as in other civil cases. No costs or disbursements shall be taxed against any party nor shall any filing fee or bond be required of any party. (i) If MNsure or new text begin a new text end district court orders eligibility for qualified health plan coverage through MNsuredeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin or the MinnesotaCare public option, new text end or eligibility for federal advance payment of premium tax credits or cost-sharing reductions contingent upon full payment of respective premiums, the premiums must be paid or provided pending appeal to the district court, court of appeals, or supreme court. Provision of eligibility by MNsure pending appeal does not render moot MNsure's position in a court of law. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.05, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Prohibition on other product lines. MNsure is prohibited from certifying, selecting, or offering products and policies of coverage that do not meet the definition of health plan or dental plan as provided in section 62V.02.new text begin Nothing in this subdivision prevents the commissioner of human services from offering the public option on the MNsure website.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare public option. new text end new text begin The board has the powers and duties provided in section 62V.15 with respect to the MinnesotaCare public option. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.051, is amended to read: 62V.051 MNSURE; CONSUMER RETROACTIVE APPOINTMENT OF A NAVIGATOR OR PRODUCER PERMITTED. Notwithstanding any other law or rule to the contrary, for up to six months after the effective date of the qualified health plannew text begin or coverage under the public optionnew text end , MNsure must permit a qualified health plan policyholdernew text begin or public option enrolleenew text end , who has not designated a navigator or an insurance producer, to retroactively appoint a navigator or insurance producer.new text begin In the case of a qualified health plan,new text end MNsure must provide notice of the retroactive appointment to the health carrier. The health carrier must retroactively pay commissions to the insurance producer if the producer can demonstrate that they were certified by MNsure at the time of the original enrollment, were appointed by the selected health carrier at the time of the enrollment, and that an agent of record agreement was executed prior to or at the time of the effective date of the policy. MNsure must adopt a standard form of agent of record agreement for purposes of this section.new text begin In the case of the public option, MNsure must provide notice of the retroactive appointment to the managed care or county-based purchasing plan, and the plan must retroactively pay commissions to the insurance producer if the producer can demonstrate they were certified by MNsure at the time of the original enrollment.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.06, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Application and certification data. (a) Data submitted by an insurance producer in an application for certification to sell a health plannew text begin or the public optionnew text end through MNsure, or submitted by an applicant seeking permission or a commission to act as a navigator or in-person assister, are classified as follows: (1) at the time the application is submitted, all data contained in the application are private data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, or nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, except that the name of the applicant is public; and (2) upon a final determination related to the application for certification by MNsure, all data contained in the application are public, with the exception of trade secret data as defined in section 13.37. (b) Data created or maintained by a government entity as part of the evaluation of an application are protected nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 13, until a final determination as to certification is made and all rights of appeal have been exhausted. Upon a final determination and exhaustion of all rights of appeal, these data are public, with the exception of trade secret data as defined in section 13.37 and data subject to attorney-client privilege or other protection as provided in section 13.393. (c) If an application is denied, the public data must include the criteria used by the board to evaluate the application and the specific reasons for the denial, and these data must be published on the MNsure website. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62V.13, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Outreach letter and special enrollment period. (a) MNsure must provide a written letter of the projected assessment under subdivision 2 to a taxpayer who indicates to the commissioner of revenue that the taxpayer is interested in obtaining information on access to health insurance. (b) MNsure must allow a special enrollment period for taxpayers who receive the outreach letter in paragraph (a) and are determined eligible to enroll in a qualified health plan through MNsurenew text begin or in the public optionnew text end . The triggering event for the special enrollment period is the day the outreach letter under this subdivision is mailed to the taxpayer. An eligible individual, and their dependents, have 65 days from the triggering event to select a qualifying health plannew text begin or the public optionnew text end and coverage for the qualifying health plannew text begin or the public optionnew text end is effective the first day of the month after plan selection. (c) Taxpayers who have a member of the taxpayer's household currently enrolled in a qualified health plan through MNsurenew text begin or in the public optionnew text end are not eligible for the special enrollment under paragraph (b). (d) MNsure must provide information to the general public about the easy enrollment health insurance outreach program and the special enrollment period described in this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [62V.15] PUBLIC OPTION; APPLICATION AND ENROLLMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Public option application. new text end new text begin (a) An individual eligible for the public option must be able to enroll in the public option on the MNsure website. new text end new text begin (b) An individual must be able to apply for and, if eligible, enroll in the public option by completing the application for a qualified health plan with premium tax credits or cost-sharing reductions. An individual must provide information needed to confirm they are not eligible for medical assistance under chapter 256B or MinnesotaCare under chapter 256L through an eligibility pathway other than the public option. new text end new text begin (c) MNsure must ensure that individuals interested in applying for a qualified health plan or the public option are able to compare coverage options in a simple, convenient, and understandable manner on the MNsure website. The website must present the coverage options in a comparable and standardized manner to the extent practicable. new text end new text begin (d) The MNsure website must include clear and conspicuous language stating that individuals can apply for the public option on the website. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility determinations. new text end new text begin (a) MNsure shall process all public option applications and make all eligibility determinations for the public option. MNsure shall make all public option eligibility determinations in accordance with section 256L.04, subdivision 15. new text end new text begin (b) Eligibility for the public option is appealable to the MNsure board under this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 7700. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administrative functions. new text end new text begin MNsure shall provide administrative functions to facilitate the offering of the public option by the commissioner of human services. These functions include but are not limited to marketing, call center operations, and certification of insurance producers. MNsure may provide additional administrative functions as requested by the commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Diversion of resources. new text end new text begin MNsure may utilize existing resources, personnel, and operations to carry out its duties under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin No limitation. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section limits the rights of MinnesotaCare public option enrollees or the commissioner of human services under chapter 256L. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contracting authorization. new text end new text begin The MNsure board may contract on a single-source basis under section 16C.10, subdivision 1, with a third-party entity already providing technical support to the board to develop and implement the technological requirements of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare public option. new text end new text begin "MinnesotaCare public option" or "public option" means health coverage provided under section 256L.29. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5b. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare public option enrollee. new text end new text begin "MinnesotaCare public option enrollee" or "public option enrollee" means an individual enrolled in MinnesotaCare under section 256L.04, subdivision 15. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.03, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Cost-sharing. (a) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to children under the age of 21 and to American Indians as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 600.5deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin , but do apply to public option enrollees as provided in section 256L.29.new text end (b) The commissioner must adjust co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles for covered services in a manner sufficient to maintain the actuarial value of the benefit to 94 percentnew text begin , except as provided for public option enrollees under section 256L.29new text end . The cost-sharing changes described in this paragraph do not apply to eligible recipients or services exempt from cost-sharing under state law. deleted text begin The cost-sharing changes described in this paragraph deleted text end deleted text begin shall not be implemented prior to January 1, 2016.deleted text end (c) The cost-sharing changes authorized under paragraph (b) must satisfy the requirements for cost-sharing under the Basic Health Program as set forth in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 600.510 and 600.520. (d) Cost-sharing for prescription drugs and related medical supplies to treat chronic disease must comply with the requirements of section 62Q.481. (e) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to additional diagnostic services or testing that a health care provider determines an enrollee requires after a mammogram, as specified under section 62A.30, subdivision 5. (f) Cost-sharing must not apply to drugs used for tobacco and nicotine cessation or to tobacco and nicotine cessation services covered under section 256B.0625, subdivision 68. (g) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) and postexposure prophylaxis (PEP) medications when used for the prevention or treatment of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, subdivision 1c, is amended to read: Subd. 1c. General requirements. To be eligible for MinnesotaCare, a person must meet the eligibility requirements of this section. A person eligible for MinnesotaCare deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin with an income less than or equal to 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines mustnew text end not be considered a qualified individual under section 1312 of the Affordable Care Act, and is not eligible for enrollment in a qualified health plan offered through MNsure under chapter 62V. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Ineligibility. Adults whose income is greater than the limits established under this section may not enroll in the MinnesotaCare programnew text begin , except as public option enrollees under subdivision 15new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Persons eligible for the public option. new text end new text begin (a) Families and individuals with income above the maximum income eligibility limit specified in subdivision 1 or 7 who meet all other MinnesotaCare eligibility requirements are eligible for the MinnesotaCare public option, subject to the enrollment cap and additional requirements established under section 256L.29. Families and individuals enrolled in the public option under this subdivision are MinnesotaCare enrollees, and all provisions of this chapter applying generally to MinnesotaCare enrollees apply to public option enrollees unless otherwise specified. new text end new text begin (b) Families and individuals may enroll in MinnesotaCare under this subdivision only during an annual open enrollment period or special enrollment period, as designated by MNsure in compliance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, sections 155.410 and 155.420. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General requirements. Individuals enrolled in MinnesotaCare under section 256L.04, subdivision 1, and individuals enrolled in MinnesotaCare under section 256L.04, subdivision 7, whose income increases above 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelinesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end are no longer eligible for the program and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be disenrolled by the commissionernew text begin , unless the individuals continue MinnesotaCare enrollment through the public optionnew text end . For persons disenrolled under this subdivision, MinnesotaCare coverage terminates the last day of the calendar month in which the commissioner sends advance notice according to Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 431.211, that indicates the income of a family or individual exceeds program income limits. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.12, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Managed care plan vendor requirements. (a) The following requirements apply to all counties or vendors who contract with the Department of Human Services to serve MinnesotaCare recipients. Managed care plan contractors: (1) shall authorize and arrange for the provision of the full range of services listed in section 256L.03 in order to ensure appropriate health care is delivered to enrollees; (2) shall accept the prospective, per capita payment or other contractually defined payment from the commissioner in return for the provision and coordination of covered health care services for eligible individuals enrolled in the program; (3) may contract with other health care and social service practitioners to provide services to enrollees; (4) shall provide for an enrollee grievance process as required by the commissioner and set forth in the contract with the department; (5) shall retain all revenue from enrollee co-payments; (6) shall accept all eligible MinnesotaCare enrollees, without regard to health status or previous utilization of health services; (7) shall demonstrate capacity to accept financial risk according to requirements specified in the contract with the department. A health maintenance organization licensed under chapter 62D, or a nonprofit health plan licensed under chapter 62C, is not required to demonstrate financial risk capacity, beyond that which is required to comply with chapters 62C and 62D; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) shall submit information as required by the commissioner, including data required for assessing enrollee satisfaction, quality of care, cost, and utilization of servicesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) shall reimburse health care providers for services provided to MinnesotaCare public option enrollees at payment rates equal to or greater than the fee-for-service Medicare payment rate for the same service, or for a similar service if the specific service is not reimbursed under Medicare. new text end (b) A health maintenance organization must be a nonprofit corporation organized under chapter 317A to serve as a managed care contractor under this section and section 256L.121. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 22. new text begin [256L.29] MINNESOTACARE PUBLIC OPTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The public option is part of the MinnesotaCare program and all provisions of this chapter apply to the public option, unless otherwise specified. These provisions include but are not limited to those related to covered health services under section 256L.03; eligibility of undocumented noncitizens under section 256L.04, subdivision 10; eligibility requirements under section 256L.07; and premium payment methods under section 256L.15. new text end new text begin (b) Section 256L.07, subdivision 4, does not apply to the public option. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application process and eligibility determination. new text end new text begin Individuals shall apply for coverage under the public option as provided in section 62V.15. Enrollment in the public option is limited to individuals eligible under section 256L.04, subdivision 15. The Board of Directors of MNsure shall process public option applications and determine eligibility for the public option as provided in section 62V.15. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Premium scale. new text end new text begin Public option enrollees shall pay premiums for individual or family coverage, as applicable, according to the following premium scale: new text end new text begin Household Income as Percentage of Federal Poverty Guidelines new text end new text begin Greater Than or Equal to new text end new text begin Not Exceeding new text end new text begin Required Premium Contributionas Percentage of Household Income new text end new text begin 201% new text end new text begin 250% new text end new text begin 4.88% new text end new text begin 251% new text end new text begin 300% new text end new text begin 6.38% new text end new text begin 301% new text end new text begin 400% new text end new text begin 7.88% new text end new text begin 401% new text end new text begin 500% new text end new text begin 8.5% new text end new text begin 501% new text end new text begin 550% new text end new text begin 9.01% new text end new text begin 551% and over new text end new text begin No maximum new text end new text begin 10% new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Cost-sharing. new text end new text begin (a) Public option enrollees are subject to the MinnesotaCare cost-sharing requirements established under section 256L.03, subdivision 5, except as provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Cost-sharing applies to all public option enrollees and there are no exemptions from cost-sharing for specific groups of individuals, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) children under age 21; new text end new text begin (2) pregnant women; and new text end new text begin (3) American Indians as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 600.5, who have incomes greater than or equal to 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall set cost-sharing for public option enrollees at an actuarial value of 94 percent, except that the actuarial value for public option enrollees with household incomes above 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines may be lower than 94 percent due to the application of the deductibles required under paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (d) No annual deductible applies to public option enrollees with household incomes that do not exceed 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. All other public option enrollees are subject to the following annual deductibles: new text end new text begin (1) for household incomes 401 percent to 500 percent of federal poverty guidelines, $500; new text end new text begin (2) for household incomes 501 percent to 600 percent of federal poverty guidelines, $1,000; and new text end new text begin (3) for household incomes 601 percent of federal poverty guidelines or above, $1,500. new text end new text begin (e) Out-of-pocket maximums for public option enrollees must not exceed those outlined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 156.130. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enrollment limits. new text end new text begin Enrollment in the public option is subject to the following limits: new text end new text begin (1) for the 2027 plan year, no enrollment limit for individuals with household incomes not exceeding 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines, and a limit of 10,000 enrollments for individuals with household incomes exceeding 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; new text end new text begin (2) for the 2028 plan year, no enrollment limit for individuals with household incomes not exceeding 550 percent of the federal poverty guidelines, and a limit of 15,000 enrollments for individuals with household incomes exceeding 550 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and new text end new text begin (3) for the 2029 plan year and subsequent plan years, no enrollment limit. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contracting and service delivery. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may contract with managed care and county-based purchasing plans for the delivery of services to public option enrollees using a procurement process that is separate and unique from that used to contract for the delivery of services to MinnesotaCare enrollees who are not public option enrollees. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall establish public option participation requirements for managed care and county-based purchasing plans and health care providers. Public option enrollees are not considered MinnesotaCare enrollees for the purpose of the participation requirement specified in section 256B.0644. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of commerce shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin REQUEST FOR FEDERAL WAIVER.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of commerce, in cooperation with the commissioner of human services and the Board of Directors of MNsure, shall submit a section 1332 waiver pursuant to United States Code, title 42, section 18052, to the Secretary of Health and Human Services, to obtain federal approval to implement this act. The commissioner of commerce shall also seek through the waiver federal approval for the state to: new text end new text begin (1) continue receiving federal Medicaid payments for Medicaid-eligible individuals and federal basic health program payments for basic health program-eligible MinnesotaCare individuals; and new text end new text begin (2) receive federal pass-through funding equal to the value of premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions that MinnesotaCare public option enrollees with household incomes greater than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines would otherwise have received. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of commerce is authorized to contract for any analyses, certification, data, or other information required to complete the section 1332 waiver application in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 33, part 108; Code of Federal Regulations, title 155, part 1308; and any other applicable federal law. The commissioner must cooperate with the federal government to obtain waiver approval under this section, and may provide any information the commissioner determines to be necessary and advisable for waiver approval to the Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Secretary of the Treasury. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin MNsure board. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Directors of MNsure for technology costs related to the development and implementation of the public option application and enrollment process. This is a onetime appropriation and is available through June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) The general fund base in fiscal year 2027 for the Board of Directors of MNsure for public awareness and marketing initiatives related to the public option is $1,000,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services to develop and implement the public option. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner of commerce. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce to develop and submit a waiver application to the federal government to implement the public option. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until January 1, 2027. new text end